Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2607
Representation by attorney.

A party has the right to be represented by an attorney at any proceeding or hearing under the Uniform Arbitration Act. A waiver thereof prior to the proceeding or hearing is ineffective.

Laws 1987, LB 71, § 7.